Arkansas, session 2025, HB1416.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 14-20-108(a), concerning dues for volunteer
fire departments, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1)(A) The quorum court of each county, upon request filed with the
quorum court by one (1) or more volunteer fire departments in the county
whose fire protection district covers an unincorporated area of the county,
may adopt an ordinance authorizing a designated county official to collect
and remit to the volunteer fire department whose fire protection district
covers an unincorporated area of the county the annual dues charged by the
volunteer fire department whose fire protection district covers an
unincorporated area of the county in consideration of providing fire
protection to those unincorporated areas in the county.
(B)(i)(a) When a quorum court receives a request for the
levy of volunteer fire department dues for a volunteer fire department whose
*SSS037*
03-19-2025 15:56:36 SSS037

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 HB1416
fire protection district covers an unincorporated area of the county and the
request has been signed by the fire chief and the chair and secretary of the
board of directors, if any, of a volunteer fire department whose fire
protection district covers an unincorporated area of the county and filed
with the county clerk, the quorum court by ordinance shall call for an
election on the issue of the levy of the volunteer fire department dues for a
volunteer fire department whose fire protection district covers an
unincorporated area of the county on each residence and on each business
having an occupiable structure.
(b)(1) The issue may be placed on the ballot
at a special election by order of the quorum court in accordance with § 7-11-
201 et seq.
(2) The special election shall be held
by August 1.
(c) If an attested petition is filed with the
county clerk and signed by a majority of registered voters in the volunteer
fire department district whose fire protection district covers an
unincorporated area of the county voting in the immediately preceding general
election, then the quorum court by ordinance shall dispense with a special
election on the issue of the levy of volunteer fire department dues for a
volunteer fire department whose fire protection district covers an
unincorporated area of the county.
(d)(1) If the levy of volunteer fire
department dues for a volunteer fire department whose fire protection
district covers an unincorporated area of the county is approved by a
majority of those voting on the issue or the county clerk determines that the
number of signatures of registered voters is sufficient and the quorum court
dispenses with a special election, the volunteer fire department dues for the
volunteer fire department whose fire protection district covers an
unincorporated area of the county shall be listed annually on real property
tax statements and collected by the county collector at the same time and in
the same manner as real property taxes.
(2)(A) The county collector shall report
delinquencies to the volunteer fire department whose fire protection district
covers an unincorporated area of the county for collection.
(B) A volunteer fire department
03-19-2025 15:56:36 SSS037

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 HB1416
whose fire protection district covers an unincorporated area of the county
may collect volunteer fire department dues for the volunteer fire department
whose fire protection district covers an unincorporated area of the county
that have become delinquent and may enforce collection by proceedings in a
court of proper jurisdiction.
(ii) The cost of the election shall be borne by the
volunteer fire department whose fire protection district covers an
unincorporated area of the county that requested the levy.
(2) The ordinance enacted by the quorum court shall set forth
the terms and conditions on which the volunteer fire department that the dues
for the volunteer fire department whose fire protection district covers an
unincorporated area of the county are to be collected by the county and for
the remission of the volunteer fire department dues for the volunteer fire
department whose fire protection district covers an unincorporated area of
the county to the volunteer fire department whose fire protection district
covers an unincorporated area of the county.
(3) However, an active member of a volunteer fire department
whose annual volunteer fire department dues for the qualifying fire
department whose annual volunteer fire department dues for the volunteer fire
department whose fire protection district covers an unincorporated area of
the county are collected in this manner may be exempt from the annual
volunteer fire department dues for the volunteer fire department whose fire
protection district covers an unincorporated area of the county at the
discretion of the volunteer fire department whose fire protection district
covers an unincorporated area of the county in consideration of providing
services to the volunteer fire department whose fire protection district
covers an unincorporated area of the county.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 14-20-108(f)-(h), concerning dues for
volunteer fire departments, is amended to read as follows:
(f) At the discretion of a volunteer fire department whose fire
protection district covers an unincorporated area of the county, a church
served by a volunteer fire department whose fire protection district covers
an unincorporated area of the county may be exempt from volunteer fire
department dues for a volunteer fire department whose fire protection
district covers an unincorporated area of the county if the church is exempt
03-19-2025 15:56:36 SSS037

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 HB1416
from real property taxes.
(g)(1)(A) By December 15 of each year or upon the creation of a
volunteer fire department whose fire protection covers an unincorporated area
of the county, a volunteer fire department whose fire protection covers an
unincorporated area of the county that uses or intends to use the county
collector for collection of the volunteer fire department dues for a
volunteer fire department whose fire protection district covers an
unincorporated area of the county shall file an annual report with the county
clerk in any county in which a portion of the volunteer fire department whose
fire protection district covers an unincorporated area of the county is
located.
(B) The county clerk shall not charge any costs or fees
for filing the annual report.
(C) The volunteer fire department whose fire protection
district covers an unincorporated area of the county shall deliver a filed
copy of the annual report to the county collector within five (5) days of
filing.
(2) The annual report shall contain the following information as
of December 15 of the current calendar year:
(A) Identification of the volunteer fire department board
members whose fire protection district covers an unincorporated area of the
county and contact information;
(B) The contact information for the volunteer fire
department chief whose fire protection district covers an unincorporated area
of the county;
(C) Information concerning to whom the official designated
to remit the volunteer fire department dues for the volunteer fire department
whose fire protection district covers an unincorporated area of the county is
to pay volunteer fire department the dues for the volunteer fire department
whose fire protection district covers an unincorporated area of the county;
and
(D) The amount of the annual dues charged by the volunteer
fire department whose fire protection district covers an unincorporated area
of the county by parcel or on each residence or business having an occupiable
structure.
(h) The official designated to remit the volunteer fire department
03-19-2025 15:56:36 SSS037

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 HB1416
dues for a volunteer fire department whose fire protection district covers an
unincorporated area of the county under this section shall not remit the dues
collected by the county collector to any volunteer fire department whose fire
protection district covers an unincorporated area of the county until the
annual report has been filed.


/s/L. Johnson




























03-19-2025 15:56:36 SSS037